Wyoming, session 2025, HB0185.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-8-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vii) is amended to read:

28-8-105. Duties of director and staff; prefiling
bills; fiscal notes.

HB0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0512
(a) It shall be the duty of the director and staff to
perform the following specific functions, together with
such other functions as the council may prescribe:

(vii) Make available to the public a live, video
broadcast of each meeting of management council, the joint
appropriations committee, the management audit committee, a
joint interim committee, a select committee or task force
that is staffed by the legislative service office. A copy
of the broadcast shall thereafter be made available on the
website of the legislature. The contents of any broadcast
made under this paragraph shall not be construed to
supersede the official written record of the meeting that
reflects formal action or recommendation when approved by
the committee or task force chairman. Nothing in this
paragraph shall require a broadcast of any portion of a
meeting that is conducted in executive session and nothing
in this paragraph shall be deemed to waive or modify any
law related to public records, public meetings or the
legislature. The failure of broadcasting capability shall
not delay the proceedings of any meeting, and no broadcast
shall be required under this paragraph where broadcasting
capability is not reasonably available. The failure to
HB0185

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0512
broadcast a meeting as provided by this paragraph shall not
affect the validity of any action taken at a meeting.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0185